Arkansas, session 2025, SB620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends for courts to consider whether a minor has
been a victim of human trafficking before transferring a delinquency matter
to the criminal division of circuit court or imposing a sentence upon the
person.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-2-210 is amended to read as follows:
5-2-210. Human trafficking — Affirmative defense.
(a) As used in this section,:
(1) "Nonviolent criminal offense" means a criminal offense that
does not constitute a violent crime as defined in § 16-90-1101; and
(2) “victim Victim of trafficking of persons” means a person who
has been subjected to trafficking of persons, § 5-18-103.
*CEB232*
04-14-2025 14:29:29 CEB232

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB620
(b) It If a person is eighteen (18) years of age or older, it is an
affirmative defense to prosecution for an offense listed under subsection (c)
of this section if at the time a person engaged in the conduct charged to
constitute the offense the person was:
(1) A victim of trafficking of persons; and
(2) Engaged in the offense as a direct result of the trafficking
of persons.
(c) The affirmative defense under this section may be raised only in a
prosecution for one (1) or more of the following offenses:
(1) Forgery, § 5-37-201;
(2) Defrauding a prospective adoptive parent, § 5-37-216;
(3) A prostitution offense under § 5-70-101 et seq.;
(4) Obscene performance at a live public show, § 5-68-305; or
(5) A controlled substance offense under § 5-64-401 et seq. § 5-
64-402 et seq. that is not a Class Y felony.
(d) If a person is seventeen (17) years of age or younger, it is an
affirmative defense to prosecution for a nonviolent criminal offense if at
the time a person engaged in the conduct charged to constitute the offense
the person was:
(1) A victim of trafficking of persons; and
(2) Engaged in the offense as a direct result of the trafficking
of persons.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-18-103(a) and (b), concerning the offense
of trafficking of persons, are amended to read as follows:
(a) A person commits the offense of trafficking of persons if he or
she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, harbors, transports, obtains, entices, solicits,
isolates, provides, or maintains a person when he or she knows or reasonably
should know that the person will be subjected to involuntary servitude;
(2) Benefits financially or benefits by receiving anything of
value from participation in a venture that he or she knows or reasonably
should know is engaged in conduct prohibited under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section;
(3) Subjects a person to involuntary servitude;
(4) Recruits, entices, solicits, isolates, harbors, transports,
04-14-2025 14:29:29 CEB232

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB620
provides, maintains, or obtains a minor for commercial sexual activity;
(5) Sells or offers to sell travel services that he or she knows
or reasonably should know include an activity prohibited under subdivisions
(a)(1)-(4) of this section;
(6) Recruits, entices, solicits, isolates, harbors, transports,
provides, maintains, or obtains a pregnant woman for the purpose of causing
the pregnant woman to place her unborn child for adoption by:
(A) The use of or threatened use of physical force;
(B) The physical restraint or threat of physical restraint
of a person;
(C) Serious physical injury or threat of serious physical
injury to a person;
(D) Abuse or threatened abuse of law or legal process;
(E) Any scheme, plan, or pattern that has a purpose to
cause the pregnant woman to believe that, if the pregnant woman does not
place the unborn child for adoption, a person would suffer serious physical
injury or physical restraint; or
(F) Means of serious harm or threats of serious harm to a
person; or
(7) Benefits financially or benefits by receiving anything of
value from participating in an act described under subdivision (a)(6) of this
section; or
(8) Recruits, entices, solicits, isolates, harbors, transports,
provides, maintains, or obtains a minor for the purpose of causing the minor
to join or remain in a criminal organization or engage in a violation of
criminal law by:
(A) The use or threatened use of physical force;
(B) The causing of serious physical harm to another
person;
(C) The threat of causing serious physical harm to another
person;
(D) Coercion, duress, or menace; or
(E) Any scheme, plan, or pattern that has a purpose to
cause a minor to believe that, if the minor does not join or remain in the
criminal organization or engage in a violation of criminal law, another
person would suffer serious harm.
04-14-2025 14:29:29 CEB232

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB620
(b) It is not a defense to prosecution under subdivision subdivisions
(a)(4) and (a)(8) of this section that the actor:
(1) Did not have knowledge of a victim's age; or
(2) Mistakenly believed a victim was not a minor.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 9-27-318(g)(9), concerning factors that a
court is required to consider in a hearing on the transfer of a delinquency
matter to a criminal division of circuit court, is amended to read as
follows:
(9) Written reports, and other materials, and other information
relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history,
including without limitation exposure to adverse childhood experiences,
childhood trauma, involvement in the child welfare or foster care systems,
status as a victim of human trafficking, sexual abuse, or rape; and

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 9-27-503(c)(9), concerning factors that a
court is required to consider in making a determination to designate a
juvenile as an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender, is amended to read as
follows:
(9) Written reports, and other materials, and other information
relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history,
including without limitation exposure to adverse childhood experiences,
childhood trauma, involvement in the child welfare or foster care systems,
status as a victim of human trafficking, sexual abuse, or rape; and

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 90, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-90-123. Sentencing of juvenile or person convicted for offense
commited as juvenile - Factors.
If a person is convicted for an offense that the person committed when
he or she was less than eighteen (18) years of age, the court shall, in
addition to any other factors that the court is required to consider before
imposing a sentence upon the person, consider the following:
(1) The exposure of the juvenile or person who committed the
offense as a juvenile to adverse childhood experiences, childhood trauma,
involvement in the child welfare or foster care systems, status as a victim
04-14-2025 14:29:29 CEB232

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 SB620
of human trafficking, sexual abuse, or rape, and the impact of trauma on the
juvenile’s behavior; and
(2) The differences between a juvenile offender and an adult
offender, including without limitation the diminished culpability of a
juvenile as compared to that of an adult and the typical characteristics of
youth.
/s/Irvin





























04-14-2025 14:29:29 CEB232